Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Article 5. Accounts, Records, and Reports.

Sec. 42.06.430.
General provisions as to accounts, records, and reports.

To the extent necessary to the performance of the duties of the commission as provided in this chapter,

the commission by regulation shall, for the purposes of this section, classify pipeline facilities, and may designate the pipeline facilities or groups of pipeline facilities within the state that constitute a pipeline system for the purposes of this section;

the commission may by regulation prescribe a uniform system of accounts for any classification of pipeline facilities which best represents and clearly reveals the investment, revenues, direct operating costs and other expenses of the subject classification of facilities, and may prescribe the manner in which the accounts and supporting records are kept in order to clearly show the investment, revenues, and costs pertaining to the subject facilities or to a pipeline system constituting a part of it; accounts shall be maintained on the calendar year basis unless the commission specifically authorizes the maintenance of accounts on the basis of a fiscal year other than the calendar year;

the commission may by regulation require a pipeline carrier or affiliated interest engaged in activities relating to pipelines to establish and maintain as part of its system of accounts continuing property records showing, as to property units which are actually being used in pipeline activity in this state, the year of placement in service, original cost and current location, and, as to a pipeline system, accounts and records in a manner showing, on a current basis, the original cost of the system in the state and related reserves for depreciation; from time to time the commission shall determine the proper and adequate rates of depreciation for each major class of property of an oil or gas pipeline facility;

the pipeline carrier shall keep its accounts for its pipeline facilities located in this state separate from any accounts relating to any other business (including another pipeline facilities business, or a subsidiary business) it engages in, directly or indirectly; except as the commission provides, property, expense or revenue used in or derived from the other business may not be considered in establishing the rates and charges of the facility;

the pipeline carrier shall keep books, accounts, papers, and records required by this chapter or by regulations adopted by the commission under this chapter in an office in this state and may not remove them from the state except upon written authority by the commission;

for pipelines subject to the Interstate Commerce Act or the Natural Gas Act, the uniform system of accounts and manner of maintaining them and the property records kept and maintained shall, where considered practicable by the commission, be the same as required under regulations prescribed by the applicable federal agency; however, where federal law permits a pipeline carrier to consolidate its reporting for more than one pipeline in which it has an ownership interest, the commission shall require the reports to be made on an individual pipeline basis for any pipeline located wholly or in part in the state;

within 90 days after the close of its authorized annual accounting period, or within additional time granted by the commission for good cause shown, a pipeline carrier shall file a verified annual report with the commission; the annual report must consist of the following:

for a pipeline subject to the Interstate Commerce Act or 15 U.S.C. 717 — 717w (Natural Gas Act), a copy of the annual report as filed with the appropriate federal agency under the applicable Act, and, for other pipelines, a report of general corporation information and financial statements in the same general format as the report of pipelines of the same classification subject to the jurisdiction of the appropriate federal agency;

in the same general format as the report referred to in (A) of this paragraph, a statement of income and investment applicable to pipelines in this state, and a statement of investment, revenues, direct operating costs and other expenses, detailed in accordance with the uniform system of accounts to be applied under this chapter, for each pipeline system designated by the commission under (1) of this section; and

such additional accounts and information as may be required under (2) of this section;

the commission may require such additional accounts and information as may be necessary.

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1972; am §§ 5, 6 ch 6 FSSLA 1973; am § 7 ch 35 SLA 1977; am § 42 ch 8 SLA 2011)

Administrative Code. —

For practice before the commission, see 3 AAC 48, art. 1.

For utility and pipeline tariffs, see 3 AAC 48, art. 2.

Sec. 42.06.440.
Inspection of records.

Subject to AS

31.05.035(c)

, the commission shall at all reasonable times have access to, and may designate any of its employees, agents, or consultants to inspect and examine, the accounts, records, books, maps, inventories, appraisals, valuations, or other reports and documents, kept by an oil or gas pipeline carrier or its affiliated interests, or prepared or kept for it by others, which relate to any contract or transaction between them. The commission may require an oil or gas pipeline carrier or its affiliated interest to file with the commission copies of any or all of these accounts, records, books, maps, inventories, appraisals, valuations, or other reports and documents, or to maintain those materials at some convenient location in the state specified by order. Costs incurred in complying with a commission request to review the records referred to in this section or to maintain these records in such a manner as to make them conveniently available for the commission’s review shall be borne by the party controlling the records.

Subject to AS

31.05.035(c)

, when participating as a party under AS

42.04.070(c)

or AS

44.23.020(e)

, the attorney general shall, at all reasonable times, have the right to reasonable access to, and may designate any of the attorney general’s employees, agents, or consultants to inspect and examine, the accounts, records, books, maps, inventories, appraisals, valuations, or other reports and documents kept by an oil or gas pipeline carrier that are relevant to the issues presented in any adjudicatory matter before the commission in which the attorney general has appeared as a party under AS

42.04.070(c)

or AS

44.23.020(e)

. This access is subject to reasonable notice to all parties with an opportunity to object before the commission. Included under this subsection is access to records or other documents under the custody or control of an affiliated interest of the pipeline carrier that relate to any contract or transaction between the public utility and the affiliated interest. Costs incurred in complying with a request to review the records referred to in this subsection or to maintain those records in such a manner as to make them conveniently available for review shall be borne by the party controlling the records.

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1972; am § 8 ch 35 SLA 1977; am § 11 ch 98 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For practice before the commission, see 3 AAC 48, art. 1.

Sec. 42.06.445.
Public records.

Except as provided in (b) and (c) of this section, or prohibited from disclosure under state or federal law, records in the possession of the commission are open to public inspection at reasonable times.

The commission may, by regulation, classify records submitted to it by regulated pipeline carriers or pipelines as privileged records that are not open to the public for inspection. However, if a record involves an application or tariff filing pending before the commission, the commission may release the record for the purpose of preparing for or making a presentation to the commission in the proceeding if the record or information derived from the record is considered by the commission to be relevant to an issue in the proceeding, and if the record or information will be used by the commission in the proceeding. A record or information that the commission releases under this subsection may be released only after giving to the party that filed the record or information reasonable notice of its intention to release the record or information and opportunity to object to that release.

A document filed with the commission that relates to the finances or operations of a pipeline subject to federal jurisdiction and that is in addition to or other than the copy of a document required to be filed with the appropriate federal agency is open to inspection only by an appropriate officer or official of the state for relevant purposes of the state.

A person may make written objection to the public disclosure of information contained in a record filed under the provisions of this chapter or of information obtained by the commission or by the attorney general under the provisions of this chapter, stating the grounds for the objection. When an objection is made, the commission shall order the information withheld from public disclosure if the information adversely affects the interest of the person making written objection and disclosure is not required in the interest of the public.

A commissioner may certify as to all official records of the commission under this section and may certify as to all official acts of the commission under this chapter.

In this section, “record” means a report, file, book, account, paper, or application, and the facts and information contained in it.

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1972; am § 13 ch 110 SLA 1981; am § 18 ch 25 SLA 1999; am § 12 ch 98 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

42.06.510

. Renumbered in 1983.

Administrative Code. —

For practice before the commission, see 3 AAC 48, art. 1.

Sec. 42.06.450.
Investigations.

The commission may investigate any matter that affects the cost or quality of transportation of oil or gas in this state by pipeline carriers or affiliated interests or of related services and may ensure compliance by pipeline carriers and their affiliated interests with the provisions of this chapter.
Investigations may be public, nonpublic, or both. In conducting investigations, the commission may compel the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of records and testimony before the commission or its designee. In the course of an investigation, the commission may exclude from attendance at the taking of investigative testimony all persons except the person compelled to attend, that person’s attorney, members of the commission or the commission’s staff, and a person authorized to transcribe the proceedings. Following an investigation and after providing reasonable notice and opportunity for hearing, the commission may institute proceedings to determine whether unreasonable practices have occurred, whether expenditures have been imprudently incurred, the costs of those practices or expenditures, and whether a pipeline carrier and its affiliated interests are in compliance with this chapter. Following such a determination, the commission shall take appropriate action to ensure that neither the direct nor indirect costs of any unreasonable practices or imprudent expenditures are included in any tariff or rate of a pipeline carrier or are borne by the public or the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1972; am § 9 ch 35 SLA 1977)

Sec. 42.06.460.
Designation of service agents.

Each pipeline carrier shall file with the commission a written appointment of a named permanent resident, which may be a corporation, of this state as its registered agent in this state upon whom service of all notices, regulations, and requests of the commission may be made.
The appointment shall specify an address in this state of the appointed agent, which address may be changed from time to time by filing a new Alaska address with the commission.
If a pipeline carrier fails to appoint an agent, service of notices, regulations, and requests may be made by posting a copy in the main office of the commission and filing a copy in the office of the lieutenant governor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1972)